Maryland, session 2025, HB0006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0006*

HOUSE BILL 6
2–106.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each county and
Baltimore City shall be responsible for reimbursing the State for the costs of administering
the Department as follows:
(i) 50% of the costs of real property valuation;
(ii) 50% of the costs of business personal property valuation; and
(iii) 50% of the costs of the Office of Information Technology within
the Department, including any funding for departmental projects in the Major Information
Technology Development Project Fund established under § 3.5–309 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
[(2) For each of fiscal years 2012 and 2013, each county and Baltimore City
shall be responsible for reimbursing the State 90% instead of 50% of the costs of
administering the Department described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.]
(2) OF THE COSTS INCURRED ANNUALLY FOR THE DATABASE OF
GEOGRAPHIC IMAGES REQUIRED UNDER § 2–210(A)(1)(III) OF THIS TITLE, EACH
COUNTY AND BALTIMORE CITY SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR REIMBURSING THE
STATE FOR:
(I) 100% OF THE COSTS TOTALING $1,000,000 OR LESS; AND
(II) 50% OF ANY COSTS IN EXCESS OF $1,000,000.
(c) Costs under subsection (b) of this section shall be allocated among the counties
and Baltimore City as follows:
(1) costs under subsection (b)(1)(i) and (iii) AND (2) of this section will be
allocated based on the number of real property accounts of a county or Baltimore City as a
percentage of the total number of real property accounts statewide as of July 1 of the
preceding fiscal year; and
(2) costs under subsection (b)(1)(ii) of this section will be allocated based on
the business personal property assessable base of a county or Baltimore City as a
percentage of the total business personal property assessable bases statewide as of July 1
of the preceding fiscal year.
2–210.
(a) (1) The Department shall prepare, install, and maintain for each county a
complete record of properties, with appropriate indexes and cross indexes, and a system of
appraisal aids that consist of:

HOUSE BILL 6 3
[(1)] (I) property location maps; [and]
[(2)] (II) records of:
[(i)] 1. new construction;
[(ii)] 2. sales;
[(iii)] 3. building costs; and
[(iv)] 4. private appraisals; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
DATABASE OF STATEWIDE AND LOCAL GEOGRAPHIC IMAGES THAT INCLUDES:
1. GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM
VISUALIZATIONS; AND
2. OBLIQUE AERIAL PHOTOGRAPHIC IMAGERY.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES SHALL
PROCURE FOR THE STATE A UNIFORM SYSTEM THAT INCLUDES ANY TOOLS OR
SERVICES NEEDED TO PREPARE, INSTALL, AND MAINTAIN THE APPRAISAL AIDS
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) TO CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES SHALL GATHER
INFORMATION AND INPUT ON THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE APPRAISAL AIDS BY
CONSULTING WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND AFFECTED OR RELEVANT UNITS OF
STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2025, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
DEVELOP POLICIES TO PROTECT THE IDENTITY OF ANY INDIVIDUAL WHOSE IMAGE
IS CAPTURED BY OBLIQUE AERIAL PHOTOGRAPHIC IMAGERY.
(b) (1) The Department shall publish instructions and directions that set forth
generally the duties to be performed and the procedures to be followed in making and
recording assessments.
(2) The instructions and directions shall be distributed to the governing
body of each county, all assessment officers, and any official who has any duty that relates
to assessments.

HOUSE BILL 6
(c) The Director shall establish and provide all forms for notices, records, reports,
and other matters that relate to the functions of supervisors and assessors.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 15, 2025,
the State Department of Assessments and Taxation shall report to the General Assembly,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the policies the
Department adopted under § 2–210(a)(3) of the Tax – Property Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.